dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX C 0 zukung/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukungi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuni/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukus/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukusi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuw/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuw/nY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuwa/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuwu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuy/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuyi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuz/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuzi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 zuli/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zulu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zum/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zungi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuni/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zusi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuwa/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuwu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuyi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuzi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ

SFX d Y 2
SFX d a e . RECENT_PAST_IND_SHORT
SFX d a ile . RECENT_PAST_IND_LONG

SFX e Y 1
SFX e a i/X . PRESENT_IND_NEG/INFINITIVE_NEG

SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 nga/X . PAST_IND_NEGATIVE

SFX g Y 1
SFX g 0 ni a IMPERATIVE_(PLURAL)

SFX i Y 4
SFX i a elani a Q_PRESENT_why
SFX i a eleni a Q_PAST_why
SFX i 0 ni . Q_what
SFX i 0 phi . Q_where

SFX y Y 4
SFX y a e . NEAR_PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx
SFX y a ile . NEAR_PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx
SFX y a ileyo . NEAR_PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx
SFX y 0 yo . QUALIFICATIVE_sfx

SFX z Y 5
SFX z a i/X . QUALIFICATIVE_sfx_NEG_SHORT
SFX z a ile/X . PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx_NEG_SHORT
SFX z a ileyo/X . PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx_NEG_LONG
SFX z a iyo/X . QUALIFICATIVE_sfx_NEG_LONG
SFX z 0 nga/X . PAST_QUALIFICATIVE_sfx_NEG
