dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
bebeza/BC
bhuja/BC
cathula/BC
dabuka/BC
dumba/BC
enwaya/BC
fifa/BC
gcaka/BC
gqoka/BC
hanga/BC
hlohla/BC
jikeleza/BC
khemezela/BC
khumbulwa/BCY
landa/BC
lumisa/BC
mukela/BC
ngqengqa/BC
ntshonga/BC
ocha/BC
phaphalaza/BC
phindisa/BC
qhola/BC
qulusa/BC
shaya/BC
sitheka/BC
thengiswa/BCY
veteza/BC
xhawula/BC
zila/BC
PFX B 0 0/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 a/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ab/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 aba/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 aba/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abaka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abang/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abanga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 abenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 abengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abuk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 ak/efYX o
PFX B 0 aku/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 al/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 alika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 alw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 ang/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 anga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ani/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 anika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 asika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 aw/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 awa/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 awuk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ay/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 aye/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 ayenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 az/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 b/di o
PFX B 0 ba/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 babeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 bebe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bebeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bebung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beling/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 belizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 belu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 belung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beng/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 benging/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bening/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beningazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 besizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bew/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bewung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beyi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beying/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bezing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bu/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 bung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 e/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 el/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eli/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eling/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elinga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 en/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eng/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eng/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eng/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 enga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engi/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 enging/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 enginga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eni/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ening/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eninga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 es/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 esi/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 esing/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esinga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ez/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezi/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezing/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ezinga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 i/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 ing/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 k/di o
PFX B 0 kung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 kw/di [ae]
PFX B 0 kwakung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 kwakuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 kwakw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 l/d o SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 laliyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 li/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ling/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 lung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 lw/d [ae] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 lwalung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 n/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 naningazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ng/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 nganging/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ngi/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 nging/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ning/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 o/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ob/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 obezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 obu/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ok/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oku/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ol/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olu/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ong/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 onga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 sasing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sing/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 u/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ubeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ubw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 w/d o SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 wawung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 waye/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 wayeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yayi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 yaying/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yobizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 z/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 zi/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 zi/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 zing/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX C 0 0/gYX [^aeiou] IMPERATIVE
PFX C 0 ukung/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG
PFX C 0 ukungak/eNYX o INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungalw/eNYX [ae] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungaw/eNYX [ae] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungazi/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 y/g [aeiou] IMPERATIVE
PFX O i engise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a esise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u ngase . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX W 0 angeba . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
